Maryland, session 2025, HB1281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–1102.
(a) (1) On the premises, or on adjacent property over which a license holder
has ownership or control, a license holder:
(i) may allow piped–in background music or one television screen;
but
(ii) unless issued a permit described in this section that authorizes
the activity, may not allow:
– 1 –

Ch. 842 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. the playing of music, including live music;
2. the operation of a karaoke machine;
3. the playing of music by a disc jockey; or
4. dancing, floor shows, or any other similar type of
entertainment.
(2) The Board may issue a permit described in this section only if the Board
finds that:
(i) the applicant can control the individuals using the licensed
premises;
(ii) the operation of the premises under the permit will not unduly
disturb the peace of the residents of the neighborhood in which the place of business is
located; and
(iii) the issuing of the permit:
1. is necessary to accommodate the public;
2. will not be detrimental to the public welfare; and
3. will not violate a county fire, health, or building
regulation.
(b) (1) There is a music permit.
(2) The Board may issue the permit to a holder of a Class B license, a Class
BLX license, a Class D license, or a Class H license.
(3) The permit authorizes the playing of recorded music or live music with
not more than two musicians.
(4) The permit holder may not allow dancing, floor shows, or similar live
entertainment.
(5) The annual permit fee is $100.
(c) (1) There is an entertainment permit.
(2) The Board may issue the permit to a holder of a Class B license, a Class
BLX license, a Class D license, or a Class H license.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 842
(3) The permit authorizes:
(i) live music with not more than four musicians; and
(ii) the playing of:
1. more than one television;
2. a karaoke machine; and
3. music by a disc jockey.
(4) The permit holder may not allow dancing, floor shows, or similar live
entertainment.
(5) The annual permit fees are:
(i) $200 for a holder of a beer and wine license; and
(ii) $300 for a holder of a beer, wine, and liquor license.
(d) (1) There is a dancing permit.
(2) The Board may issue the permit to a holder of:
(i) a Class B license;
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, a Class
BLX license;
(iii) a Class C license;
(iv) a Class D license; or
(v) except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, a Class H
license.
(3) The permit authorizes the holder to provide music, dancing, and other
legal forms of entertainment.
(4) The Board may not issue the permit to a holder of a Class BLX license
or a Class H license if the premises for which the Class BLX license or Class H license is
issued is within 1,000 feet in a straight line from entry to entry from a place of worship or
school.
– 3 –

Ch. 842 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) The annual permit fees are:
(i) $200 for a holder of a beer and wine license;
(ii) $400 for a holder of a beer, wine, and liquor license; and
(iii) no charge for a holder of a Class C license.
(E) (1) THERE IS A LIMITED CULTURAL SPECIAL EVENT PERMIT.
(2) THE BOARD, IN ITS SOLE DISCRETION, MAY ISSUE THE PERMIT TO
A HOLDER OF:
(I) A CLASS B LICENSE;
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A CLASS BLX LICENSE;
(III) A CLASS C LICENSE;
(IV) A CLASS D LICENSE; OR
(V) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A CLASS H LICENSE.
(3) THE PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO PROVIDE CULTURAL
MUSIC, CULTURAL DANCING, AND OTHER LEGAL FORMS OF CULTURAL
ENTERTAINMENT FOR 1 DAY ON A SPECIFIC DATE STATED IN THE PERMIT
APPLICATION.
(4) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE THE PERMIT TO A HOLDER OF A
CLASS BLX LICENSE OR A CLASS H LICENSE IF THE PREMISES FOR WHICH THE
CLASS BLX LICENSE OR CLASS H LICENSE IS ISSUED IS WITHIN 1,000 FEET IN A
STRAIGHT LINE FROM ENTRY TO ENTRY FROM A PLACE OF WORSHIP OR SCHOOL.
(5) BEFORE ISSUING A PERMIT, THE BOARD MAY REQUIRE A LICENSE
HOLDER TO PROVIDE INFORMATION ON THE PLANNED CULTURAL EVENT FOR
WHICH THE PERMIT IS REQUESTED, INCLUDING:
(I) THE DATE OF THE EVENT; AND
(II) THE TYPE OF CULTURAL ENTERTAINMENT PLANNED.
(6) THE PERMIT FEES FOR EACH CULTURAL EVENT ARE:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 842
(I) $15 PER DAY FOR A HOLDER OF A BEER AND WINE LICENSE;
(II) $25 PER DAY FOR A HOLDER OF A BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE; AND
(III) NO CHARGE FOR A HOLDER OF A CLASS C LICENSE.
[(e)] (F) (1) There is an outdoor permit.
(2) The Board may issue the permit to a holder of a Class B license, a Class
BLX license, a Class C license, a Class D license, or a Class H license.
(3) The permit authorizes the holder to provide outdoor table service to
customers on the grounds of the licensed establishment.
(4) The annual permit fee is $100.
(5) Before the permit may be renewed, a holder shall obtain approval from
the Board.
[(f)] (G) (1) There is an outdoor entertainment permit.
(2) The Board may issue the permit to a holder of a Class B license, a Class
BLX license, a Class C license, a Class D license, or a Class H license who also holds a
music permit, an entertainment permit, or a dancing permit under this section.
(3) The permit authorizes the holder to provide:
(i) the same form of entertainment outdoors that the holder is
allowed to provide indoors under the holder’s music permit, entertainment permit, or
dancing permit; and
(ii) outdoor table service or cafe service.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –